Maryland, session 2025, HB0945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
8–201.
(a) (1) There shall be a statewide primary election in every even–numbered
year.
(2) A primary election shall be held:
(i) in the year in which the Governor is elected, on the [last]
FOURTH Tuesday in June; and
(ii) in the year in which the President of the United States is elected,
on the fourth Tuesday in April.
(b) In Baltimore City, there shall be a primary election for municipal offices on
the fourth Tuesday in April in the year in which the President of the United States is
elected.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 1 –